Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.270

Enforcement provisions—Mandamus—Appellate review.

The superior court of the county in which the officer subject to recall resides has original jurisdiction to compel the performance of any act required of any public officer or to prevent the performance by any such officer of any act in relation to the recall not in compliance with law.

The supreme court has like original jurisdiction in relation to state officers and revisory jurisdiction over the decisions of the superior courts. Any proceeding to compel or prevent the performance of any such act shall be begun within ten days from the time the cause of complaint arises, and shall be considered an emergency matter of public concern and take precedence over other cases, and be speedily heard and determined. Appellate review of a decision of any superior court shall be begun and perfected within fifteen days after its decision in a recall election case and shall be considered an emergency matter of public concern by the supreme court, and heard and determined within thirty days after the decision of the superior court.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1423. Prior: 1988 c 202 s 30; 1984 c 170 s 10; 1965 c 9 s 29.82.160; prior: 1913 c 146 s 14; RRS s 5363. Formerly RCW 29.82.160.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Writ procedure superseded by RAP 2.1(b), 16.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.